Washington statutes.
RCW 2.68.030

Schedule of user fees.

The judicial information system committee shall develop a schedule of user fees for in-state noncourt users and all out-of-state users of the judicial information computer system and charges for judicial information system products and licenses for the purpose of distributing and apportioning the full cost of operation and continued development of the system among the users. The schedule shall generate sufficient revenue to cover the costs relating to (1) the payment of salaries, wages, other costs including, but not limited to the acquisition, operation, and administration of acquired information services, supplies, and equipment; and (2) the development of judicial information system products and services. As used in this section, the term "supplies" shall not be interpreted to delegate or abrogate the state purchasing and material control director's responsibilities and authority to purchase supplies as provided in chapter 43.19 RCW.

[ 1989 c 364 s 3.]